Hawaii statutes.
§484-2 Administration. This chapter
shall be administered by the director of commerce and consumer affairs. [L
1967, c 223, §2; HRS §484-2; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L
2008, c 19, §50]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next